Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB441.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.605 is amended to read as follows:
Any member retired by reason of service may return to work in a position covered by the Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System and continue to receive his or her retirement allowance under the following conditions:
(1) Any member who is retired with thirty (30) or more years of service may return to work in a full-time or a
part-time position, or in a position providing substitute teaching service, covered by the Teachers' Retirement
System and earn up to a maximum of seventy-five percent (75%) of the member's last annual compensation
measured on a daily rate to be determined by the board of trustees. For purposes of determining whether the
salary of a member returning to work is seventy-five percent (75%) or less of the member's last annual
compensation, all remuneration paid and benefits provided to the member, on an actual dollar or fair market
value basis as determined by the retirement system, excluding employer-provided medical insurance required
under subsection (4)[(5)] of this section, shall be considered. Members who were retired on or before June 30,
2002, shall be entitled to return to work under the provisions of this section as if they had retired with thirty
(30) years of service. Nonqualified service credit purchased under the provisions of KRS 161.5465 or
elsewhere with any state-administered retirement system shall not be used to meet the thirty (30) year
requirement set forth in this subsection. Out-of state teaching service provided in public schools for
kindergarten through grade twelve (12) may count toward the thirty (30) year requirement set forth in this
subsection even if it is not purchased as service credit, if the member obtains from his or her out-of-state
employer certification of this service on forms prescribed by the retirement system;
(2) Any member who is retired with less than thirty (30) years of service after June 30, 2002, may return to work
in a full-time or part-time position, or in a position providing substitute teaching service, covered by the
Teachers' Retirement System and earn up to a maximum of sixty-five percent (65%) of the member's last
annual compensation measured on a daily rate to be determined by the board of trustees. For purposes of
determining whether the salary of a member returning to work is sixty-five percent (65%) or less of the
member's last annual compensation, all remuneration paid and benefits provided to the member, on an actual
dollar or fair market value basis as determined by the retirement system, excluding employer-provided medical
insurance required under subsection (4)[(5)] of this section, shall be considered;
(3) [Reemployment of a retired member under subsection (1) or (2) of this section in a full-time teaching or
nonteaching position in a local school district shall be permitted only if the employer certifies to the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System that there are no other qualified applicants available to fill the teaching or
nonteaching position. The employer may use any source considered reliable, including but not limited to data
provided by the Education Professional Standards Board and the Department of Education, to determine
whether other qualified applicants are available to fill the teaching or nonteaching position. The Kentucky
Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish procedures to determine whether
other qualified applicants are available to fill a teaching or nonteaching position and, if not, for filling the
position with a retired member who will then be permitted to return to work in that position under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section. The administrative regulations shall ensure that a retired member shall not be hired in
a teaching or nonteaching position by a local school district until the superintendent of the school district
assures the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System that every reasonable effort has been made to recruit other
qualified applicants for the position on an annual basis;
(4) ]Under this section, an employer may employ full-time a number of retired members not to exceed ten[three]
percent (10%)[(3%)] of the membership actively employed full-time by that employer. The board of trustees
may reduce this ten[three] percent (10%)[(3%)] cap upon recommendation of the retirement system's actuary
if a reduction is necessary to maintain the actuarial soundness of the retirement system. The board of trustees
may increase the ten[three] percent (10%)[(3%)] cap upon a determination that an increase is warranted to
help address a shortage in the number of available teachers and upon the determination of the retirement
system's actuary that the proposed cap increase allows the actuarial soundness of the retirement system to be
maintained. For purposes of this subsection, "full-time" means the same as defined by KRS 161.220(21). A
local school district may exceed the quota established by this subsection by making an annual written request
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
to the Kentucky Department of Education which the department may approve on a year-by-year basis[ if the
statewide quota has not been met. A district's written request to exceed its quota shall be submitted no sooner
than two (2) weeks after the start of the school year];
(4)[(5)] (a) Except as provided by subsection (9)[(10)] of this section, a member returning to work in a full-
time or part-time position, or in a position providing substitute teaching service, under subsection (1) or
(2) of this section shall contribute to an account with the retirement system that shall be administered
independently from and with no reciprocal impact with the member's original retirement account, or any
other account from which the member is eligible to draw a retirement allowance.
(b) Except as provided by subsection (9)[(10)] of this section, a member returning to work under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section shall make contributions to the retirement system at the rate provided under
KRS 161.540. The new account shall independently meet all vesting requirements as well as all other
conditions set forth in KRS 161.600(1) or (2), as applicable, before any retirement allowance is payable
from this account. The retirement allowance accruing under this new account shall be calculated
pursuant to KRS 161.620. This new account shall not entitle the member to a duplication of the benefits
offered under KRS 161.620(7) or 161.675, nor shall this new account provide the benefits offered by
KRS 161.520, 161.525, 161.620(3), 161.655, 161.661, or 161.663.
(c) A member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall waive his or her medical
insurance with the Teachers' Retirement System during the period of reemployment and shall receive
the medical insurance coverage that is generally provided by the member's active employer to the other
members of the retirement system that the active employer employs. If medical insurance coverage is
not available from the employer, the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System may provide coverage for
the member.
(d) A member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall not be eligible to purchase
service credit for any service provided after the member's effective date of retirement but prior to the
date that the member returns to work. A member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this
section shall not be eligible to purchase service credit that the member would have otherwise been
eligible to purchase prior to the member's initial retirement.
(e) A member who returns to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or in the event of the death of
the member, the member's estate or applicably designated beneficiary, shall be entitled, within ninety
(90) days of the posting of the annual report submitted by the employer, to a refund of contributions as
permitted and limited by KRS 161.470;
(5)[(6)] The board of trustees may annually, on July 1, adjust the current daily rate of a member's last annual
compensation, for each full twelve (12) month period that has elapsed subsequent to the member earning his or
her last annual compensation, by the percentage increase in the annual average of the consumer price index for
all urban consumers for the calendar year preceding the adjustment as published by the Federal Bureau of
Labor Statistics, not to exceed five percent (5%) annually. Each annual adjustment shall become part of the
member's daily rate base. Failure to comply with the salary limitations set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of
this section as may be adjusted by this subsection shall result in a reduction of the member's retirement
allowance or any other benefit to which the member would otherwise be entitled on a dollar-for-dollar basis
for each dollar that the member exceeds these salary limitations, and the member shall be refunded his or her
retirement contributions made on the compensation that exceeds these salary limitations. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, a member retiring from a local school district who returns to work for a
local school district under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be entitled, without any reduction to his or
her retirement allowance or any other retirement benefit, to earn a minimum amount equal to one hundred
seventy dollars ($170) per day;
(6)[(7)] (a) A retired member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall have
separated from service for a period of at least one (1) year if returning to work for the same employer
on a full-time basis, and at least three (3) months if returning to work for a different employer on a full-
time basis. A retired member returning to work under subsection (1) or (2) of this section on a part-time
basis shall have separated from service for a period of at least three (3) months before returning to work
for any employer.
(b) As an alternative to the separation-from-service requirements in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a
retired member who is returning to work for the same employer in a full-time position under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section may elect a separation-from-service of not less than two (2)
months followed by a forfeiture of the retired member's retirement allowance on a month-to-month

CHAPTER 144 3
basis for each month that the member has separated from service for less than twelve (12) full months.
A retired member returning to work for the same employer in a part-time position, or for a different
employer in a full-time position, may elect an alternative separation-from-service requirement of at
least two (2) months followed by a forfeiture of the member's retirement allowance for one (1) month.
During the period that the member forfeits his or her retirement allowance and thereafter, member and
employer contributions shall be made to the retirement system as a result of employment in any position
subject to membership in the retirement system. The member shall contribute to an account with the
retirement system subject to the conditions set forth in subsection (4)[(5)] of this section.
(c) A retired member who is returning to work for an employer that has employees who participate in the
Teachers' Retirement System shall comply with the separation-from-service requirements in this
subsection before performing any service for the employer, regardless of whether the retired member is
providing service in a position covered by the Teachers' Retirement System.
(d) The starting date for any separation from service required under this subsection shall be the effective
date of the member's retirement.
(e) The separation-from-service requirements of this subsection are not met if there is a prearranged
agreement between the member and an employer that has employees who participate in the Teachers'
Retirement System prior to retirement for the member to work for the employer after retirement.
(f) The Teachers' Retirement System may require the member and the employer for which the member is
returning to work to certify in writing on a form prescribed by the Teachers' Retirement System that no
prearranged agreement was or will be entered into between the member and employer prior to
retirement for the member to work for the employer after retirement.
(g) Failure to comply with the separation-from-service requirements in this subsection voids a member's
retirement and the member shall be required to return all the retirement benefits he or she received, with
interest, for the period of time that the member returned to work without a sufficient separation from
service;
(7)[(8)] (a) Effective July 1, 2004, local school districts may employ retired members in full-time or part-
time teaching or administrative positions in critical shortage areas without limitation on the
compensation of the retired members that is otherwise required by subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.[ Under provisions of this subsection, a local school district may only employ retired members
to fill critical shortage positions for which there are no other qualified applicants as determined by the
local superintendent.] The number of retired members that a local school district may employ under this
subsection shall be no more than four (4)[two (2)] members per local school district or ten[one] percent
(10%)[(1%)] of the total active members employed by the local school district on a full-time basis as
defined under KRS 161.220(21), whichever number is greater. Retired members returning to work
under this subsection shall be subject to the separation-from-service requirements set forth in subsection
(6)[(7)] of this section. Retired members returning to work under this subsection shall waive their
medical insurance coverage with the retirement system during their period of reemployment and receive
medical insurance coverage that is offered to other full-time members employed by the local school
district. Retired members returning to work under this subsection shall contribute to an account subject
to the conditions set forth in subsection (4)[(5)] of this section. Retired members returning to work
under this subsection shall make contributions to the retirement system at the rate provided under KRS
161.540. The employer shall make contributions at the rate provided under KRS 161.550. Local school
districts shall make annual payments to the retirement system on the compensation paid to the
reemployed retirees at the rates determined by the retirement system's actuary that reflect any accrued
liability resulting from the reemployment of these members.
(b) The Department of Education may employ retired members in full-time or part-time teaching or
nonteaching positions without the limitations on compensation otherwise required by subsections (1)
and (2) of this section to fill critical shortage areas in the schools it operates, including the Kentucky
School for the Blind[,] and the Kentucky School for the Deaf,[ and the Kentucky Virtual High School,]
and to serve on audit teams. The department shall be subject to the same requirements as local school
districts as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, except the Teachers' Retirement System shall
determine the maximum number of employees that may be employed under this paragraph;
(8)[(9)] The return-to-work limitations set forth in this section shall apply to retired members who are returning
to work in the same position from which they retired, or a position substantially similar to the one from which
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
they retired, or a position described in KRS 161.046 or any position listed in KRS 161.220(4) which requires
membership in the retirement system. Positions which generally require certification or graduation from a four
(4) year college or university as a condition of employment which are created, or changed to remove the
position from coverage under KRS 161.220(4) are also subject to the return to work limitations set forth in this
section. The board of trustees shall determine whether employment in a nonteaching position is subject to this
subsection;
(9)[(10)] (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, individuals who become members on or after
January 1, 2022, who subsequently retire and begin drawing a monthly lifetime retirement allowance
from the Teachers' Retirement System, who following retirement are reemployed with an employer
participating in the Teachers' Retirement System, shall not be eligible to contribute to or earn benefits in
a second retirement account in the Teachers' Retirement System during the period of reemployment.
(b) The provisions of subsections (1) to (7)[(8)] of this section are not subject to KRS 161.714;[
(11) Any member retired by reason of service may waive his or her annuity and return to full-time employment in a
position covered by the Teachers' Retirement System under the following conditions:
(a) The member shall receive no annuity payments while employed in a covered position, shall waive his or
her medical insurance coverage with the Teachers' Retirement System during the period of
reemployment, and shall receive the medical insurance coverage that is generally offered by the
member's active employer to the other members of the retirement system employed by the active
employer. The member's estate or, if there is a beneficiary applicably designated by the member, then
the beneficiary, shall continue to be eligible for life insurance benefits as provided in KRS 161.655.
Service subsequent to retirement shall not be used to improve an annuity, except as provided in
paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection;
(b) Any member who waives regular annuity benefits and returns to teaching or covered employment shall
be entitled to make contributions on the salaries received for this service and have his or her retirement
annuity recalculated as provided in the regular retirement formula in KRS 161.620(1), less any
applicable actuarial discount applied to the original retirement allowance due to the election of a joint
and last survivor option. Retirement option and beneficiary designation on original retirement shall not
be altered by postretirement employment, and dependents and spouses of the members shall not become
eligible for benefits under KRS 161.520, 161.525, or 161.661 because of postretirement employment;
(c) When a member returns to full-time teaching or covered employment as provided in subsection (b) of
this section, the employer is required to withhold and remit regular retirement contributions. The
member must be employed full-time for at least one (1) consecutive contract year to be eligible to
improve an annuity. The member shall be returned to the annuity rolls on July 1 following completion
of the contract year or on the first day of the month following the month of termination of service if
full-time employment exceeds one (1) consecutive contract year. A member shall not be returned to the
annuity rolls until after he or she has filed a retirement application in compliance with KRS 161.600(6).
Any discounts applied at the time of the original retirement due to service or age may be reduced or
eliminated due to additional employment if full-time employment is for one (1) consecutive contract
year or longer; and
(d) A member retired by reason of service who has been employed the equivalent of twenty-five (25) days
or more during a school year under KRS 161.605 may waive the member's retirement annuity and
return to regular employment covered by the Teachers' Retirement System during that school year a
maximum of one (1) time during any five (5) year period, beginning with that school year;]
(10)[(12)] Retired members may be employed in a part-time teaching capacity by an agency described in KRS
161.220(4)(b) or (n), not to exceed the equivalent of twelve (12) teaching hours in any one (1) fiscal year.
Retired members may be employed for a period not to exceed the equivalent of one hundred (100) days in any
one (1) fiscal year in a part-time administrative or nonteaching capacity by an agency described in KRS
161.220(4)(b) or (n) in a position that would otherwise be covered by the retirement system. Except as
otherwise provided by this subsection, the return to work provisions set forth in subsections (1) to (7)[(8)] of
this section shall not apply to retired members who return to work solely for an agency described in KRS
161.220(4)(b) or (n). Calculation of the number of days and teaching hours for part-time teaching, substitute
teaching, or part-time employment in a nonteaching capacity under this section shall not exceed the ratio
between a school year and the actual months of retirement for the member during that school year. The board
of trustees by administrative regulation may establish fractional equivalents of a day of teaching service. Any
member who exceeds the twelve (12) hour or one hundred (100) day limitations of this subsection shall be

CHAPTER 144 5
subject to having his or her retirement voided and be required to return all retirement allowances and other
benefits paid to the member or on the member's behalf since the effective date of retirement. In lieu of voiding
a member's retirement, the system may reduce the member's retirement allowance or any other benefit to
which the member would otherwise be entitled on a dollar-for-dollar basis for each dollar of compensation that
the member earns in employment exceeding twelve (12) hours, one hundred (100) days, or any apportionment
of the two (2) combined. Retired members returning to work for an employer described in KRS 161.220(4)(b)
or (n) shall comply with the separation-from-service requirements of subsection (6)[(7)] of this section;
(11)[(13)] When a retired member returns to employment in a part-time teaching capacity or in a nonteaching
capacity as provided in subsection (10)[(12)] of this section, the employer shall contribute annually to the
retirement system on the compensation paid to the retired member at rates determined by the retirement system
actuary that reflect accrued liability for retired members who return to work under subsection (10)[(12)] of this
section; and
(12)[(14)] For retired members who return to work during any one (1) fiscal year in both a position described in
KRS 161.220(4)(b) or (n) and in a position described under another provision under KRS 161.220(4), and for
retired members who return to work in a position described under KRS 161.220(4)(b) or (n) in both a teaching
and an administrative or nonteaching capacity, the board of trustees shall adopt a methodology for a pro rata
apportionment of days and hours that the retired member may work in each position.
(13) Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS 161.220 to 161.716 to the contrary, an annuitant who has
returned to work following retirement with an employer that does not participate in the state-administered
retirement systems shall not be required to take health insurance coverage through the employer and the
system shall continue to provide health insurance coverage and benefits to the annuitant during the period
of employment, except as may be required by the Medicare Secondary Payer Act under 42 U.S.C. sec.
1395y(b).
Section 2. KRS 156.106 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section and KRS 161.605, "critical shortage area" means a lack of certified teachers in
particular subject areas, in grade levels, or in geographic locations at the elementary and secondary level, as
determined annually by the commissioner of education. The commissioner may use any source considered
reliable including, but not limited to, data provided by the Education Professional Standards Board and local
education agencies to identify the critical shortage areas.
(2) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish procedures
to be used to appoint retired teachers and administrators to positions in critical shortage areas under this
section and KRS 161.605.[ The administrative regulations shall assure that:
(a) A retired teacher or administrator shall not be hired until the superintendent assures that he or she has
made every reasonable effort to recruit an active teacher or administrator for the position on an annual
basis; and]
(b) A retired teacher or administrator appointed to a position in a critical shortage area shall be paid, at a
minimum, a salary at Rank II with ten (10) years of experience based on a single salary schedule
adopted by the district.
(c) The commissioner of education shall report members reemployed under this section to the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System.[
(3) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish procedures to be
used to appoint retired teachers and administrators to positions in critical shortage areas under this section and
KRS 161.605. The administrative regulations shall assure that a retired teacher or administrator shall not be
hired until the superintendent assures the commissioner of education that the superintendent has made every
reasonable effort to recruit an active teacher or administrator for the position on an annual basis. The
commissioner of education shall report members reemployed under this section to the Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System.]
(3)[(4)] If a local school district needs a person to fill a critical shortage position after reaching its quota
established under KRS 161.605, the commissioner of education with the approval of the executive director of
the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System may allow the district to exceed its quota if the statewide quota has
not been met.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 3. Notwithstanding the amendments made to subsection (11) of Section 1 of this Act, retired
members participating in the retirement waiver program established by KRS 161.605(11) prior to the effective date of
this Act may continue to participate in the program.
Signed by Governor April 1, 2025.